Illinois, session 104th, SB3501.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Restock the Block Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Covered entity" means an institutional real estate 8investor or an entity that receives funding from an 9institutional real estate investor for the purchase of a 10residential property. A loan provided in exchange for a 11mortgage of the residential property that is being purchased 12is not considered funding for the purposes of this 13subdivision, provided that the mortgage must be of a type for 14which members of the general public can apply. "Covered 15entity" does not include: 16        (1) an organization that is described in Section 17    501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and exempt from tax 18    under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; 19        (2) a community land trust; 20        (3) an organization primarily engaged in the 21    construction or rehabilitation of residential properties; 22        (4) a person who owns federal subsidized housing; or 23        (5 a creditor or its loan servicer acquiring ownership   SB3501- 2 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1    of real property in full or partial satisfaction of a 2    secured debt. 3    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 4    "Disqualified sale" means a sale or transfer to: 5        (1) a corporation or entity engaged in a trade or 6    business; 7        (2) a group of more than 2 individuals; or 8        (3) a person who owns any other residential property. 9    "Institutional real estate investor" means an entity or 10combined group that, directly or indirectly: 11        (1) owns 10 or more single-family homes or 8 or more 12    multi-family homes; 13        (2) manages or receives funds pooled from investors 14    and acts as a fiduciary with respect to one or more 15    investors; and 16        (3) has $30,000,000 or more in net value or assets 17    under management on any day during the taxable year. 18    An entity is considered owning a residential property if 19it directly owns the residential property or indirectly owns 2010% or more of the residential property. 21    "Multi-family home" means a single residential building 22divided into at least 2 but no more than 3 dwelling units 23designed to be occupied by more than one household living 24separately. 25    "Residential property" means a single-family home or a 26multi-family home as defined in this Act.   SB3501- 3 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1    "Single family home" means a standalone residential 2structure designed to be occupied by one household. 3    Section 10. Excess residential property. 4    (a) There is imposed on each covered entity, an annual fee 5of 10% of the property value of each residential property 6owned by the covered entity as of the last day of the calendar 7year in excess of 10 single family homes or 8 multi-family 8homes. 9    (b) The fee collected must be deposited into the Illinois 10Affordable Housing Trust Fund with the purpose of funding 11public housing projects and developments and providing rental 12and mortgage assistance. 13    Section 15. Disqualified sales. A residential property 14that is sold or transferred in a disqualified sale is treated 15as a residential property that is owned by the covered entity 16on the last day of the calendar year.  17    Section 20. 90-day waiting period. 18    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and 19after the effective date of this Act, it is unlawful for a 20covered entity to purchase, acquire, or offer to purchase or 21acquire any interest in residential property unless the 22residential property has been listed for sale to the general 23public for at least 90 days.   SB3501- 4 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1    (b) The 90-day waiting period in subsection (a) restarts 2if the seller changes the asking price for the residential 3property, and a covered entity is prohibited from purchasing, 4acquiring, or offering to purchase or acquire any interest in 5the residential property until it has been listed for sale to 6the general public at the new asking price for at least an 7additional 90 days. 8    (c) A covered entity that violates subsection (a) or 9subsection (b) may be subject to civil damages and penalties 10in an amount not to exceed $250,000. 11    (d)(1) At the time an offer is made by a covered entity 12purchasing residential property, the covered entity is 13required to submit to the seller or anyone acting as an agent 14for the seller a form that has been signed and notarized by the 15covered entity purchaser or an authorized agent thereof 16stating that the purchaser is a covered entity. 17    (2) Within 3 days of submitting a form to a seller or 18seller's agent under paragraph (1) of this subsection, a 19covered entity must file the form with the Department. 20    (3) Any covered entity or covered entity's agent that 21violates this subdivision may be subject to civil damages and 22penalties in an amount not to exceed $10,000. 23    Section 25. Rules reporting. 24    (a) The Department shall adopt rules to administer and 25enforce the provisions of this Act. Those rules must require   SB3501- 5 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1reporting as the Department determines necessary or 2appropriate to carry out the purposes of this Act, including 3reporting with respect to: 4        (1) status as a covered entity; 5        (2) the dates on which residential properties owned by 6    applicable property owners were acquired by the applicable 7    property owner; 8        (3) the dates on which residential properties owned by 9    an applicable property owner are sold by the applicable 10    property owner in accordance with this Act; and 11        (4) whether any person acquiring a residential 12    property from an applicable property owner owns any other 13    residential properties. 14    (b) On notice and demand of the Department, any applicable 15property owner who knowingly fails to report as required under 16this Section or who fails to include correct information in 17the report shall pay a penalty of $25,000 to be deposited into 18the Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund with the purpose of 19funding public housing projects and developments and providing 20rental and mortgage assistance. 21    Section 900. The Illinois Affordable Housing Act is 22amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 23    (310 ILCS 65/5)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 1255)24    Sec. 5. Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund.   SB3501- 6 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1    (a) There is hereby created the Illinois Affordable 2Housing Trust Fund, hereafter referred to in this Act as the 3"Trust Fund" to be held as a separate fund within the State 4Treasury and to be administered by the Program Administrator. 5The purpose of the Trust Fund is to finance projects of the 6Illinois Affordable Housing Program as authorized and approved 7by the Program Administrator. The Funding Agent shall 8establish, within the Trust Fund, a General Account, a Bond 9Account, a Commitment Account and a Development Credits 10Account. The Funding Agent shall authorize distribution of 11Trust Fund moneys to the Program Administrator or a payee 12designated by the Program Administrator for purposes 13authorized by this Act. After receipt of the Trust Fund moneys 14by the Program Administrator or designated payee, the Program 15Administrator shall ensure that all those moneys are expended 16for a public purpose and only as authorized by this Act.17    (b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 8(c) of this 18Act, there shall be deposited in the Trust Fund such amounts as 19may become available under the provisions of this Act, 20including, but not limited to: 21        (1) all receipts, including dividends, principal and 22    interest repayments attributable to any loans or 23    agreements funded from the Trust Fund; 24        (2) all proceeds of assets of whatever nature received 25    by the Program Administrator, and attributable to default 26    with respect to loans or agreements funded from the Trust   SB3501- 7 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1    Fund; 2        (3) any appropriations, grants or gifts of funds or 3    property, or financial or other aid from any federal or 4    State agency or body, local government or any other public 5    organization or private individual made to the Trust Fund; 6        (4) any income received as a result of the investment 7    of moneys in the Trust Fund; 8        (5) all fees or charges collected by the Program 9    Administrator or Funding Agent pursuant to this Act; 10        (6) amounts as provided in Section 31-35 of the Real 11    Estate Transfer Tax Law; 12        (7) other funds as appropriated by the General 13    Assembly; and 14        (8) any income, less costs and fees associated with 15    the Program Escrow, received by the Program Administrator 16    that is derived from Trust Fund Moneys held in the Program 17    Escrow prior to expenditure of such Trust Fund Moneys.18    (c) Additional Trust Fund Purpose: Receipt and use of 19federal funding for programs responding to the COVID-19 public 20health emergency. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 21Act or any other law limiting or directing the use of the Trust 22Fund, the Trust Fund may receive, directly or indirectly, 23federal funds from the Homeowner Assistance Fund authorized 24under Section 3206 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 252021 (Public Law 117-2). Any such funds shall be deposited 26into a Homeowner Assistance Account which shall be established   SB3501- 8 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1within the Trust Fund by the Funding Agent so that such funds 2can be accounted for separately from other funds in the Trust 3Fund. Such funds may be used only in the manner and for the 4purposes authorized in Section 3206 of the American Rescue 5Plan Act of 2021 and in related federal guidance. Also, the 6Trust Fund may receive, directly or indirectly, federal funds 7from the Emergency Rental Assistance Program authorized under 8Section 3201 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 9and Section 501 of Subtitle A of Title V of Division N of the 10Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116–260). 11Any such funds shall be deposited into an Emergency Rental 12Assistance Account which shall be established within the Trust 13Fund by the Funding Agent so that such funds can be accounted 14for separately from other funds in the Trust Fund. Such funds 15may be used only in the manner and for the purposes authorized 16in Section 3201 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and in 17related federal guidance. Expenditures under this subsection 18(c) are subject to annual appropriation to the Funding Agent. 19Unless used in this subsection (c), the defined terms set 20forth in Section 3 shall not apply to funds received pursuant 21to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. Notwithstanding any 22other provision of this Act or any other law limiting or 23directing the use of the Trust Fund, funds received under the 24American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 are not subject to the terms 25and provisions of this Act except as specifically set forth in 26this subsection (c).   SB3501- 9 -LRB104 19687 JRC 33136 b1    (d) Additional Trust Fund purpose. The Trust Fund may also 2receive moneys that are designated for deposit into the Trust 3Fund as provided in the Restock the Block Act. Those moneys may 4be used as provided in that Act. 5(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-8, eff. 7-1-23.)